Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2313
Excise tax; stored
wheat.

The tax provided
for by section
2-2311 shall be
deducted as provided
by the Nebraska Wheat Resources Act, whether
such wheat is stored in this or any other state.

Laws 1955, c. 5, § 13, p. 63;

Laws 2012, LB905, § 7.
July 19, 2012